zh-CN: 蓝牙功能: 仅接收器; 发射器和接收器（收发器）; 仅发射器; 其他
ko: 블루투스 기능: 수신 전용; 송수신기 (트랜시버); 송신 전용; 기타
sv: Bluetooth-funktionalitet: Endast mottagare; Sändare och mottagare (transceiver); Endast sändare; Övrigt
bg-BG: Bluetooth функционалност: Само приемник; Предавател и приемник (трансивър); Само предавател; Други
sl-SI: Funkcionalnost Bluetooth: Samo sprejemnik; Oddajnik in sprejemnik (primopredajnik); Samo oddajnik; Drugo
de: Bluetooth-Funktionalität: Nur Empfänger; Sender und Empfänger (Transceiver); Nur Sender; Sonstiges
fr: Fonctionnalité Bluetooth: Récepteur uniquement; Émetteur et récepteur (émetteur-récepteur); Émetteur uniquement; Autre
ro-RO: Funcționalitate Bluetooth: Doar receptor; Transmițător și receptor (transceiver); Doar transmițător; Altele
el: Λειτουργικότητα Bluetooth: Μόνο δέκτης; Πομπός και δέκτης (πομποδέκτης); Μόνο πομπός; Άλλο
zh-TW: 藍牙功能: 僅接收; 發射器和接收器（收發器）; 僅發射; 其他
it: Funzionalità Bluetooth: Solo ricevitore; Trasmettitore e ricevitore (ricetrasmettitore); Solo trasmettitore; Altro
sk-SK: Funkčnosť Bluetooth: Iba prijímač; Vysielač a prijímač (transceiver); Iba vysielač; Iné
ja: Bluetooth機能: レシーバーのみ; トランスミッターおよびレシーバー（トランシーバー）; トランスミッターのみ; その他
pl: Funkcjonalność Bluetooth: Tylko odbiornik; Nadajnik i odbiornik (transceiver); Tylko nadajnik; Inne
fi: Bluetooth-toiminnallisuus: Vain vastaanotin; Lähetin ja vastaanotin (lähetin-vastaanotin); Vain lähetin; Muu
nl: Bluetooth-functionaliteit: Alleen ontvanger; Zender en ontvanger (transceiver); Alleen zender; Andere
lt-LT: Bluetooth funkcionalumas: Tik imtuvas; Siųstuvas ir imtuvas (siųstuvas-imtuvas); Tik siųstuvas; Kita
da: Bluetooth-funktionalitet: Kun modtager; Sender og modtager (transceiver); Kun sender; Andet
ru: Функциональность Bluetooth: Только приемник; Передатчик и приемник (трансивер); Только передатчик; Другой
pt-BR: Funcionalidade Bluetooth: Somente receptor; Transmissor e receptor (transceptor); Somente transmissor; Outro
hu: Bluetooth-funkcionalitás: Csak vevő; Adó és vevő (adó-vevő); Csak adó; Egyéb
es: Funcionalidad Bluetooth: Solo receptor; Transmisor y receptor (transceptor); Solo transmisor; Otros
th: ฟังก์ชันบลูทูธ: ตัวรับเท่านั้น; ตัวส่งและตัวรับ (ทรานซีฟเวอร์); ตัวส่งเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Bluetooth funkcionalnost: Samo prijemnik; Odašiljač i prijemnik (primopredajnik); Samo odašiljač; Ostalo
en: Bluetooth functionality: Receiver only; Transmitter and receiver (transceiver); Transmitter only; Other
tr: Bluetooth işlevselliği: Sadece alıcı; Verici ve alıcı (alıcı-verici); Sadece verici; Diğer
nb: Bluetooth-funksjonalitet: Kun mottaker; Sender og mottaker (transceiver); Kun sender; Annet
vi: Chức năng Bluetooth: Chỉ thu; Thu và phát (thu phát); Chỉ phát; Khác
pt-PT: Funcionalidade Bluetooth: Apenas recetor; Transmissor e recetor (transcetor); Apenas transmissor; Outro
cs: Funkce Bluetooth: Pouze přijímač; Vysílač a přijímač (transceiver); Pouze vysílač; Jiné